Utah statutes.
63M-1-907.   Agreements.

The administrator shall enter into agreements with each successful applicant that have specific terms and conditions for each loan or assistance, including:

(1)  repayment schedules;

(2)  interest rates;

(3)  specific economic activity required to qualify for the loan or assistance or for repayment credits;

(4)  collateral or security, if any; and

(5)  other terms and conditions considered appropriate by the administrator.

